Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 106.010 is amended to read:
106.010. Marriage is a civil contract entered into in person by males at least [ 17] 18 years of
age and females at least [ 17] 18  years of  age, who are otherwise capable, and solemnized in ac-
cordance with ORS 106.150.
SECTION 2.  ORS 106.041 is amended to read:
106.041. (1) All persons  wishing to enter into a marriage contract shall obtain a marriage license
from the  county clerk upon application, directed to any person, religious organization or congre-
gation, or secular organization, authorized by ORS  106.120 to solemnize marriages, and authorizing
the person, religious organization or  congregation, or secular organization, to join together as
spouses in a marriage the persons named in the license.
(2) The State Registrar of the Center for Health Statistics shall provide  a standard form of the
application, license and record of marriage to be used in this state that must include:
(a) Each  applicant’s Social Security number recorded on a confidential portion of the applica-
tion, license and record of marriage;
(b) Certain statistical data regarding age, place of birth, sex, occupation,  residence and previous
marital status of each applicant;
(c) The name and address of the affiant under ORS 106.050, if required; and
(d) Each applicant’s name after marriage as provided in ORS 106.220.
(3) The form of application, license and record provided by the state registrar under  subsection
(2) of this section may not require an address for any religious organization or congregation  au-
thorized by ORS 106.120 to solemnize marriages.
(4) Each applicant for a marriage license shall  file with the county clerk from whom the mar-
riage license is sought a written application for the license on forms prescribed for this  purpose by
the Center for Health Statistics.
Enrolled Senate Bill 548 (SB 548-INTRO) Page 1
(5) A  marriage license must contain the following statement: “Neither you nor your spouse is
the property  of the other. The laws of the State of Oregon affirm your right to enter into marriage
and at the same time to live within the marriage free from violence and abuse.”
(6) An applicant may not intentionally make a  material false statement in the records required
by this section.
(7) The county clerk may not issue a  marriage license until the provisions of this section and
ORS 106.050 [ and 106.060] are complied with.
SECTION 3.  ORS 106.050 is amended to read:
106.050. [(1)] The county clerk may accept any reasonable proof of the [ applicant’s] age of an
applicant for a marriage license  satisfactory to the clerk.  The clerk may require proof of age by
affidavit of some person  other than either of the parties seeking the license if the clerk deems it
necessary in order to determine the age of an applicant to the clerk’s satisfaction.
[(2) If an applicant for  a marriage license is less than 18 years of age, the applicant must file with
the county clerk an affidavit of some person other than either of the  parties seeking the license showing
the facts other than age necessary to be shown  under ORS 106.060 in the particular case, except the
consent of the parent or guardian required by ORS 106.060 shall not be part of the  affidavit. The af-
fidavit is sufficient authority to the clerk, so far as the facts stated therein, for issuing the license. ]
SECTION 4.  ORS 106.100 is amended to read:
106.100. (1) The county clerk who issues the marriage  license shall maintain records relating to
marriages licensed in the county. The  records must include the names of the parties before and after
marriage, the consent of the [ parent or ] guardian, if any, the name of  the affiant, the substance of
the affidavit upon which the license was issued and the date of the license.
(2) Upon return of the completed application, license and record of  marriage under ORS 106.170,
the county clerk shall add the date of the marriage ceremony to the clerk’s records maintained un-
der subsection (1) of this section and file the completed application,  license and record of marriage.
Except as provided in ORS 205.320, the  county clerk may not charge a fee for filing, recording or
indexing the application, license and record of marriage.
(3) The county clerk shall, upon completion of the requirements of this  section and ORS 106.077,
deliver the original  completed application, license and report of marriage to the Center for Health
Statistics as required under ORS 432.173.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the record of marriage maintained by a county
clerk is not a vital record as defined in ORS 432.005 and  is a public record open and subject to full
disclosure.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 109.056 is amended to read:
109.056. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) or (3) of this section,  a parent or guardian of
a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly executed power of attorney, may delegate to another
person, for a period  not exceeding six months, any of the powers of the parent or guardian regarding
care, custody or property of the minor child  or ward, except the power to consent to [ marriage or ]
adoption of a minor ward.
(2) A parent or guardian of a minor child may delegate the powers designated in subsection  (1)
of this section to a school administrator for a period not exceeding 12 months.
(3)(a) As used in this subsection, “servicemember-parent” means a parent or guardian:
(A) Who is:
(i) A member of the organized militia of this state;
(ii) A member of the Reserves of the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps or Coast Guard  of
the United States;
(iii) A member of  the commissioned corps of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Adminis-
tration; or
(iv) A member of  the Public Health Service of the United States Department of Health and
Human Services detailed by proper authority for duty with the Army or Navy of the  United States;
and
Enrolled Senate Bill 548 (SB 548-INTRO) Page 2
(B) Who is required to enter  and serve in the active military service of the United States under
a call or order by the President of the United States or to serve on state  active duty as defined in
the Oregon Code of Military Justice.
(b) A servicemember-parent of a minor child may delegate the powers  designated in subsection
(1) of this section for a period not exceeding the term of active duty service plus 30 days.
(c) Except as  provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection, if the minor child is living with the
child’s other parent, a delegation under paragraph (b) of this subsection must be  to the parent with
whom the minor child is living unless a court finds that the  delegation would not be in the best
interests of the minor child.
(d) When the servicemember-parent has joint custody of the minor  child with the child’s other
parent or another individual, and the  servicemember-parent is married to an individual other than
the child’s other parent,  the servicemember-parent may delegate the powers designated in subsection
(1) of this section to the spouse of the servicemember-parent for a  period not exceeding the term
of active duty service plus 30 days, unless a court finds that the delegation would not be in  the best
interests of the minor child.
SECTION 6.  ORS 125.315 is amended to read:
125.315. (1) A guardian has the following powers and duties:
(a) Except to the extent of any limitation under the order of appointment,  the guardian has
custody of the protected person and may establish the protected person’s place of abode  within or
without this state.
(b) The guardian  shall provide for the care, comfort and maintenance of the protected person
and, whenever appropriate, shall arrange for training  and education of the protected person.
Without regard  to custodial rights of the protected person, the guardian shall take reasonable care
of the person’s clothing,  furniture and other personal effects unless a conservator has been ap-
pointed for the protected person.
(c) Subject to the provisions of ORS 127.505  to 127.660 and subsection (3) of this section, the
guardian may consent, refuse consent or  withhold or withdraw consent to health care, as defined in
ORS 127.505, for the  protected person. A guardian is not liable solely by reason of consent under
this paragraph for any injury to the protected person resulting from the negligence or acts  of third
persons.
(d) The guardian may:
(A) Make advance funeral and burial arrangements;
(B) Subject to the provisions of ORS 97.130, control the disposition of the remains of  the pro-
tected person; and
(C) Subject to the provisions of ORS 97.965, make an  anatomical gift of all or any part of the
body of the protected person.
(e) The guardian of a minor has the powers and responsibilities of  a parent who has legal cus-
tody of a child, except that the guardian has  no obligation to support the minor beyond the support
that can  be provided from the estate of the minor, and the guardian is not liable for the torts of the
minor. The guardian may consent to the [ marriage or ] adoption of a protected person who is  a mi-
nor.
(f) Subject to the provisions  of ORS 125.320 (2), the guardian may receive money and personal
property deliverable to the protected  person and apply the money and property for support, care and
education of the protected person. The guardian shall exercise care  to conserve any excess for the
protected person’s needs.
(g) The guardian shall promote the self-determination  of the protected person and, to the extent
practicable, encourage the  protected person to participate in decisions, act on the protected person’s
own behalf and develop or regain the  capacity to manage the protected person’s personal affairs.
To accomplish the duties under this paragraph, the guardian shall:
(A) Become or remain personally acquainted with the protected person and maintain sufficient
contact with the protected person,  including through regular visitation, to know the protected
person’s abilities, limitations, needs, opportunities and physical and mental health;
Enrolled Senate Bill 548 (SB 548-INTRO) Page 3
(B) To the extent  practicable, identify the values and preferences of the protected person and
involve the protected person in decisions affecting the  protected person, including decisions about
the protected person’s care, dwelling, activities or social interactions; and
(C) Make reasonable efforts to identify and facilitate supportive relationships  and services for
the protected person.
(h) In making decisions for the protected person, the guardian  shall make the decisions the
guardian reasonably believes the protected person  would make if the protected person were able,
unless doing so would unreasonably  harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests
of the protected person. To determine the decision the protected person would  make if able, the
guardian shall consider the protected person’s previous  or current instructions, preferences, opin-
ions, values and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by  the guardian.
(i) If the guardian  cannot make a decision under paragraph (h) of this subsection because the
guardian does  not know and cannot reasonably determine the decision the protected person would
make if able, or the guardian reasonably  believes the decision the protected person would make
would unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal  or financial interests of the protected
person, the guardian shall act in  accordance with the best interest of the protected person. In de-
termining the best interest of the protected person, the guardian shall consider:
(A) Information received from professionals and persons that demonstrate sufficient  interest in
the welfare of the protected person;
(B) Other information  the guardian believes the protected person would consider if the protected
person were able; and
(C) Other factors a reasonable person in the circumstances of the protected  person would con-
sider, including consequences for others.
(2) If a conservator has been appointed for the protected person, the guardian may file a motion
with the court seeking an order of the court on the duties of the  conservator relating to payment
of support for the protected person.
(3) A guardian may consent to the withholding or withdrawing of artificially  administered nu-
trition and hydration for a protected  person only under the circumstances described in ORS 127.580
(1)(a), (b), (d),  (e) or (f) and, if the protected person has a medical condition specified in ORS 127.580
(1)(b), (d), (e) or (f), the condition has been medically confirmed.
SECTION 7.  ORS 419B.376 is amended to read:
419B.376. A person, agency or institution having guardianship of a  ward by reason of appoint-
ment by the court has the duties and authority of a guardian of the  ward, including but not limited
to the following:
(1) To authorize surgery for the ward, but this authority does not  prevent the person having
legal custody of the ward from acting under ORS 419B.373 (4).
(2) To authorize the ward to enlist in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(3) To consent to the ward’s marriage  if the ward is at least 18 years of age .
(4) When  the ward has been committed under ORS 419B.527, to consent to the adoption of the
ward.
(5) To make other decisions concerning the ward of substantial legal significance.
(6) To make such reports and  to supply such information to the court as the court may from
time to time require.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 419C.558 is amended to read:
419C.558. A person, agency or institution having  guardianship of an adjudicated youth by reason
of appointment by the court has the duties and authority of a  guardian of the adjudicated youth,
including but not limited to the following:
(1) To authorize  surgery for the adjudicated youth, but this authority does not prevent the per-
son having legal custody of the adjudicated youth from acting under ORS 419C.550 (4).
(2) To authorize the adjudicated youth to enlist in the Armed Forces of the United States.
(3) To consent to  the adjudicated youth’s marriage  if the adjudicated youth is at least 18
years of age .
Enrolled Senate Bill 548 (SB 548-INTRO) Page 4
(4) To make other decisions concerning the adjudicated youth of substantial legal significance.
(5) To make such reports and  to supply such information to the court as the court may from
time to time require.
SECTION 9.
ORS 106.060 is repealed.
Passed by Senate March 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 548 (SB 548-INTRO) Page 5